District of Columbia statutes.
5-121.04

Applicable police provisions.

All laws which govern the police force in the matters of persons, property, or money shall be applicable to all private detectives (or to persons practicing as detectives, whatever other name they may assume) and such detectives or persons shall make like returns and dispositions of such matters as required by law and the rules of the Mayor governing the police force.

R.S., D.C., § 430
June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 6
“Detectives” defined and licensing of private detectives, see § 47-
1981 Ed., § 4-174.
1973 Ed., § 4-174.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.